Maryland, session 2026, HB1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–504.
(a) In this section, “quota” means the mandating of a finite number of arrests
made or citations issued that a law enforcement officer must meet in a specified time period.
(b) A law enforcement agency may not:
(1) establish OR MAINTAIN a formal or informal quota for the law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1392*

HOUSE BILL 1392
enforcement agency or law enforcement officers of the agency; [or]
(2) use the number of arrests made [or], INVESTIGATIONS CONDUCTED,
citations issued, OR WARRANTS SERVED OR EXECUTED by a law enforcement officer as
[the sole or primary criterion] THE BASIS for EVALUATION, COMPENSATION,
DISCIPLINE, promotion, demotion, dismissal, or transfer of the officer;
(3) REQUIRE A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR SUGGEST TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER THAT THE OFFICER IS EXPECTED TO MEET A QUOTA; OR
(4) OFFER A FINANCIAL REWARD OR OTHER BENEFIT TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DETERMINED BY OR BASED ON THE QUOTA OF THE
OFFICER.
(c) This section does not preclude a law enforcement agency from:
(1) using quantitative data for arrests, citations, and other law
enforcement activities as management tools or in evaluating performance;
(2) collecting, analyzing, and applying information concerning the number
of arrests and citations in order to ensure that a particular law enforcement officer or group
of law enforcement officers does not violate an applicable legal obligation; or
(3) assessing the proportion of the arrests made and citations issued by a
law enforcement officer or group of law enforcement officers.
(D) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY REPORT THE USE OF QUOTAS
BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL CREATE AND
MAKE READILY AVAILABLE ONLINE A STANDARD FORM THAT MAY BE USED BY ANY
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO REPORT THE USE OF QUOTAS BY A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE OFFICER.
(3) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL INVESTIGATE
ANY REPORT MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 1 YEAR
AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF THE REPORT.
(4) IF AFTER THE INVESTIGATION THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL FINDS THAT A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY USED QUOTAS IN VIOLATION
OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ORDER THE
AGENCY TO CEASE AND DESIST FROM USING QUOTAS.

HOUSE BILL 1392 3
(5) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT:
(I) DETERMINE THE PROCEDURE FOR THE INVESTIGATION
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE INVESTIGATION AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.